Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3322
Erroneous suspension.

If a motor vehicle operator's license or a professional, occupational, or recreational license is found to have been suspended erroneously, the license holder shall have his or her license reinstated or renewed without the payment of any reinstatement or renewal fee, but if a fee was paid because of the error, such fee shall be returned to the license holder by the relevant licensing authority.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 22.